Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1938.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be


codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:


A. This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Oklahoma


DNA/RNA-Based Vaccine Safety and Sovereignty Act”.


B. The purpose of this act is to protect the health, safety,


and autonomy of this state by prohibiting the use, sale, and


distribution of DNA/RNA-based vaccines in humans, animals, and


agricultural produce within the state, even during declared


emergencies.



Req. No. 2382 Page 1


C. Recognizing the significant risks associated with these


technologies, including adverse health effects, insufficient long-


term safety data, and potential environmental impacts, this


legislation ensures robust protections regardless of circumstances


that might otherwise permit regulatory shortcuts or diminished


oversight during public health emergencies.


D. By addressing these concerns and upholding the principles of


informed consent, transparency, and scientific integrity, this act


affirms this state’s commitment to safeguarding its citizens,


animals, and agricultural systems from untested or potentially


hazardous pharmaceutical interventions.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 9000 of Title 63, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. For the purposes of this act, “DNA/RNA-based vaccines”


refers to all products that intend to function by utilizing,


modifying, or transferring genetic material to induce an immune


response. DNA/RNA-based vaccines include gene-based vaccines


developed using messenger ribonucleic acid (mRNA) technology,


modified messenger ribonucleic acid (modRNA) technology, self-


amplifying messenger ribonucleic acid (saRNA) technology, or


deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) technology. DNA/RNA-based vaccines


include human gene therapy products that mediate their effects by


transcription or translation of transferred genetic material or by

Req. No. 2382 Page 2


specifically altering human genetic sequences. These products


include nucleic acids such as plasmids and in vitro transcribed


ribonucleic acid (RNA); genetically modified microorganisms such as


viruses, bacteria, and fungi; engineered site-specific nucleases


used for human genome editing; and ex vivo genetically modified


human cells.


B. No individual, entity, corporation, government agency, or


organization shall use DNA/RNA-based vaccines or products in this


state in any form including, but not limited to, by manufacturing,


distributing, administering, or facilitating the sale of DNA/RNA-


based vaccines or products in this state, whether for human or


animal use.


C. 1. Any individual or entity, corporation, government


agency, or organization that violates subsection B of this section


shall be subject to civil and criminal penalties.


2. A fine of no less than Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00)


per violation shall be imposed for each instance of unauthorized


production, sale, or administration of DNA/RNA-based vaccines within


the state, with each act of distribution or administration to a


separate individual, animal, or agricultural product constituting a


separate violation.


3. Additionally, any person or entity knowingly and willfully


violating subsection B of this section shall, upon conviction, be


guilty of a felony punishable by a fine not to exceed Two Hundred

Req. No. 2382 Page 3


Fifty Thousand Dollars ($250,000.00), by imprisonment in the custody


of the Department of Corrections for a term not to exceed ten (10)


years, or by both such fine and imprisonment.


D. The Attorney General may investigate and prosecute


violations of this act, bring civil actions to enjoin continued


offenses, and seek restitution for affected individuals, businesses,


or agricultural entities.


E. Any resident of this state who is subjected to the


administration of DNA/RNA-based vaccines in violation of this act


may bring a private cause of action against responsible parties to


seek compensatory and punitive damages, including court costs and


reasonable attorney fees.


F. Whistleblowers who report violations shall be protected from


retaliation and may be eligible for a reward of up to thirty percent


(30%) of collected fines if their information leads to a successful


enforcement action.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2382 DC 1/15/2026 8:57:41 AM











Req. No. 2382 Page 4